District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That
this act may be cited as the “Smoke-Free Residential Environments Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Smoking Restriction Act of 1979, effective
September 28, 1979 (D.C. Law 3-22; D.C. Official Code § 7-1701 et seq.), is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1701) is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a) is amended by striking the phrase “in which the public
congregates” and inserting the phrase “in which the public congregates or in multi-unit rental
housing”.
(2) Subsection (b) is amended by striking the phrase “and to protect children from
exposure to the use of tobacco products by prohibiting their use in event sites for organized
sporting events” and inserting the phrase “, to protect children from exposure to the use of
tobacco products by prohibiting their use in event sites for organized sporting events, and to


protect District residents from exposure to secondhand smoke in multifamily housing.” in its
place.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 7-1702) is amended as follows:
(1) Redesignate paragraph (3A) as paragraph (3B).
(2) A new paragraph (3A) is added to read as follows:
“(3A) “Multifamily housing” means a housing accommodation containing two or
more dwelling units.”.
(c) Section 4(a) (D.C. Official Code § 7-1703(a)) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (9) is amended to read as follows:
“(9) In a playground or public recreational facility or while sitting or standing
within 25 feet of the property line of a playground or public recreational facility when another
person is present; provided, that smoking or using tobacco in places enumerated in section
2015.1 of Title 20 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (20 DCMR § 2105.1) that
are located within 25 feet of a playground or public recreational facility shall be exempt from
this provision.”.
(2) Paragraph (10)(B) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase
“; and” in its place.
(3) A new paragraph (11) is added to read as follows:
“(11) In multifamily housing or while sitting or standing within 25 feet of an entrance or
a window of multifamily housing when another person is present.”.
(d) Section 5 (D.C. Code § 7-1704) is amended as follows:
(1) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “signs” and inserting
the phrase “notice”.


(2) A new subsection (a-4) is added to read as follows:
“(a-4)(1) A person who owns multifamily housing and intends to enter into a lease
agreement with a tenant for a housing accommodation shall include notice of the provisions of
this act as it pertains to smoking restrictions in multifamily housing in the proposed lease
agreement.
“(2) A person who leases multifamily housing on the effective date of this
subsection shall provide notice to tenants of the provisions of this act as it pertains to smoking
restrictions in multifamily housing.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).